Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.070

Acceptance and vulnerability tests.

An agreement to purchase or lease a voting system or a component of a voting system is subject to that system or component passing:

(1) An acceptance test sufficient to demonstrate that the equipment is the same as that certified by the secretary of state and that the equipment is operating correctly as delivered to the county; and

(2) A vulnerability test conducted by a federal or state public entity which includes participation by local elections officials.

[ 2020 c 101 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 307. Prior: 1998 c 58 s 1; 1990 c 59 s 23. Formerly RCW 29.33.145.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 101: See note following RCW 29A.12.200.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.